Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6164.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1166c. (1) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, each public high school shall offer at least 1 computer science course to pupils enrolled in the public high school, as determined by the district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. (2) The computer science course described in subsection (1) must meet the following criteria: (a) It must meet or exceed standards established by the state board of education. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the public high school must make a good-faith effort to offer the course in an in-person setting. If an in-person setting is not feasible for purposes of meeting the requirement under this subdivision, the public high school may offer the course through a virtual or distance-based option. The requirement to make a good-faith effort to offer the course in an in-person setting does not apply to a public high school that operates entirely virtually. A public high school may meet the requirements of this subdivision by offering the course in any facility operated by a school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, career and technical education center, or career and technical education consortium. (c) It must be listed as an option on the school's catalog of courses, as confirmed by the district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Computer science" means the study of computers and algorithmic processes, including, but not limited to, their principles, hardware and software designs, implementation, and impact on society, and is a study that focuses on teaching students how to create new technologies and not solely the use of technology. (b) "Public high school" means a public school that offers at least 1 of grades 9 to 12.